Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383B.041, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Economic interest disclosure; Three Rivers Park District. new text end new text begin A candidate for park district board of commissioners in Three Rivers Park District must file an original statement of economic interest with Hennepin County within 14 days of the end of the candidate filing period. An elected official in Three Rivers Park District must file the annual statement required in section 10A.09, subdivision 6, with Hennepin County for each year the individual remains in office. An original statement and annual statement must contain the information listed in section 10A.09, subdivision 5. The provisions of section 10A.09, subdivisions 6a, 7, and 9, apply to statements required by this subdivision. new text end